Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2806
Ordinances; requirements.

(1) All ordinances and resolutions or orders for the appropriation or payment of money shall require for their passage or adoption the concurrence of a majority of all members of the council.

(2) Ordinances of a general or permanent nature shall be read by title on three different days unless three-fourths of the members vote to suspend this requirement.

(3) Ordinances shall contain no subject which is not clearly expressed in the title, and, except as provided in section 19-915, no ordinance or section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the new ordinance contains the entire ordinance or section as revised or amended and the ordinance or section so amended is repealed, except that for an ordinance revising all the ordinances of the municipal county the only title necessary shall be: "An ordinance of the municipal county of .........., revising all the ordinances of the municipal county." Under such title, all the ordinances may be revised in sections and chapters or otherwise, may be corrected, added to, and any part suppressed, and may be repealed with or without a saving clause as to the whole or any part without other title.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 6.